Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 3

Pest Control Compact [Repealed]

43-6-301. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 43-2801, 43-7-101; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

43-6-302. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 43-2802, 43-7-102; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

43-6-303. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 43-2803, 43-7-103; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

43-6-304. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 43-2804, 43-7-104; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

43-6-305. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 43-2805, 43-7-105; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

43-6-306. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 43-2806, 43-7-106; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

43-6-307. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 43-2807, 43-7-107; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

43-6-308. [Repealed.]

Acts 1969, ch. 81, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 43-2808, 43-7-108; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 6, part 3, §§ 43-6-301 — 43-6-308, concerned the Pest Control Compact.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3, provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by § 43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.